Utah statutes.
73-13-11.   Original compact -- Act as ratifying.

The Compact ratified by this act is the original signed by the commissioners representing the states of Arizona, Colorado, New Mexico, Utah, and Wyoming, and the secretary of the commission, and approved by the representative of the United States of America, and deposited in the archives of the Department of State of the United States of America, and with the Division of Archives of the state of Utah.



Amended by Chapter 67, 1984 General Session

